Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1,112
Gift; allocation; use; approval, required; terms or conditions.

(1) Any gift made available to the State of Nebraska for any purpose or purposes, together with the income from such gift, shall be allocated to the state agency designated by the donor or, if no state agency is designated by the donor, shall be used in accordance with Article VII, section 9, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

(2) Acceptance of a gift shall be subject to approval by the receiving state agency and any additional requirements provided in the State Acceptance of Gifts Act. A gift accepted subject to terms or conditions shall be held subject to those terms or conditions.

Laws 2024, LB998, § 4.